Maine, session 132, LD1803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §19101, sub-§11-A is enacted to read:
11-A. Hydrocodone combination product. "Hydrocodone combination product"
means a pharmaceutical containing specified doses of hydrocodone in combination with
other drugs in specified amounts.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §19101, sub-§24, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
24. Practice of optometry. "Practice of optometry" has the same meaning as
described in section 19102.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §19102 is enacted to read:
§19102. Practice of optometry
The following provisions describe the practice of optometry for the purposes of this
chapter.
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Diagnostic and therapeutic pharmaceutical agent" means any prescription or
nonprescription drug delivered by any route of administration, which may be used or
prescribed for the diagnosis, treatment, prevention or mitigation of abnormal
conditions and diseases of the visual system or the human eye and its adnexa, including
approved narcotics when used in the treatment of disorders or diseases of the eye and
its adnexa.
B. "Ophthalmic surgery" means a procedure upon the human eye and its adnexa in
which in vivo tissue is injected, cut, burned, frozen, sutured, vaporized, coagulated or
photo disrupted by the use of surgical instrumentation, including, but not limited to, a
scalpel, cryoprobe, laser or electric cautery, or by the use of ionizing radiation.
"Ophthalmic surgery" does not include any surgical procedures that do not involve the
eye or its adnexa.
2. Practice of optometry. The practice of optometry is the evaluation, diagnosis,
prevention or treatment of diseases, disorders or conditions of the human vision system,
eyes and adjacent and associated structures, including:
A. Measuring the powers and range of vision of the human eye using subjective and
objective means, including the use of lenses, prisms and automated testing devices, to
determine its accommodative and refractive state and general scope of function of
human vision;
B. The adaptation, sale and dispensing of frames and lenses in all their forms to
overcome errors of refraction and restore as near as possible normal human vision;
C. Ordering appropriate diagnostic laboratory or imaging tests for the purpose of
prescribing contact lenses for prosthetic or therapeutic purposes, including
orthokeratology;
D. The dispensing of samples to initiate treatment;
E. The use or prescription of lenses, prisms, vision therapy and vision rehabilitation;
Page 1 - 132LR1434(01)

F. The prescription of diagnostic and therapeutic pharmaceutical agents for ocular
disease, by any delivery system necessary, including schedule II narcotic agents limited
to hydrocodone combination products and schedule III, IV and V controlled substances
as described in 21 United States Code, Section 812;
G. The use and prescription of medical devices; and
H. Ophthalmic surgery, except for the performance of the procedures described in
subsection 3.
The practice of optometry includes the adaptation, sale and dispensing of plano or zero
power contact lenses and ordering appropriate diagnostic laboratory or imaging tests to
facilitate the provision of contact lenses for cosmetic purposes.
3. Ophthalmic surgical procedures excluded from practice of optometry. The
following ophthalmic surgery procedures are excluded from the practice of optometry,
except for the preoperative and postoperative care for those procedures:
A. Retina laser procedures;
B. Penetrating keratoplasty or corneal transplant of any kind;
C. Surgery performed with general anesthesia, regional anesthesia or monitored
anesthesia care or the administration of such anesthesia;
D. Injection into the vitreous chamber of the eye to treat any retinal or macular disease;
E. Laser-assisted in situ keratomileusis;
F. Corneal implants;
G. Surgery related to removal of the eye from a living human being;
H. Surgery requiring full thickness incision or excision of the cornea or sclera;
I. Surgery requiring incision of the iris and ciliary body, including diathermy or
cryotherapy;
J. Vitrectomy;
K. Retinal surgery;
L. Surgical extraction of an intraocular or crystalline lens;
M. Surgical implantation of an intraocular lens;
N. Incisional or excisional surgery of the extraocular muscles;
O. Surgery of the eyelid for confirmed malignancies or for incisional cosmetic or
incisional mechanical repair;
P. Surgery of the orbit;
Q. Incisional or excisional surgery of the lacrimal system; and
R. Surgery requiring full thickness conjunctivoplasty, including pterygium or
pinguecula excision.
4. Credentialing requirements for surgical and laser procedures. A person may
not perform ophthalmic surgery or laser procedures unless the person has satisfied the
credentialing requirements established by the board.
Page 2 - 132LR1434(01)

This section does not prevent a person from doing the mechanical work associated with
adapting, fitting, bending, adjusting, providing, replacing or duplicating eyeglasses with
ophthalmic lenses.
This chapter may not be construed to limit the ability of an optometrist to use diagnostic
or therapeutic instruments using laser, light, radiofrequency or ultrasound technology in
the performance of eye care or limit an optometrist's ability to perform ophthalmic surgical
procedures other than those surgical procedures excluded under subsection 3 as long as the
optometrist has satisfied the appropriate credentialing requirements of the board.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §19103 is enacted to read:
§19103. Scope of practice
The following provisions govern the determination of the scope of practice of
optometry.
1. Rules; board authority. The board shall adopt rules to further define the scope of
practice of optometry as set out in section 19102.
2. Scope of practice and public health emergencies. The board, when there is a
public health emergency, may authorize an optometrist with a license under section 19304,
subsection 2, paragraph A, B or C to administer an inoculation that would not otherwise be
permitted within the optometrist's scope of practice under this chapter in order to support
systemic public health needs.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §19201-A is enacted to read:
§19201-A. Exclusive authority
The board has exclusive authority to determine what constitutes the practice of
optometry as set out in section 19102 and as further defined by the board by rule. This
chapter may not be construed to permit any agency, board or other entity of this State other
than the board to determine what constitutes the practice of optometry.
The board has sole jurisdiction to exercise any other powers and duties of the board
established under this chapter.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §19202, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is amended
to read:
8. Authority to order a mental or physical examination. The authority to direct a
licensee or license applicant, who by virtue of an application for and acceptance of a license
to practice under this chapter is considered to have given consent, to submit to an
examination of the board's choice. With respect to a licensee, the board may order that
licensee to submit to an examination whenever information is received by the board that
would cause the board to reasonably determine that the licensee may be suffering from a
mental illness or physical illness that may be interfering with competent practice under this
chapter or from the use of intoxicants or drugs to an extent that the use is preventing the
licensee from practicing optometry competently and safely. A licensee or license applicant
examined pursuant to an order of the board may not prevent the testimony of the examining
individual or prevent the acceptance into evidence of the report of the examining individual
in a proceeding under this chapter. The board may petition the District Court for immediate
suspension of license if the licensee fails to comply with an order of the board to submit to
a mental or physical examination pursuant to this subsection; and
Page 3 - 132LR1434(01)

Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §19202, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is amended
to read:
9. Report. The duty to submit to the commissioner, on or before August 1st of each
year, the board's annual report of its operations and financial position for the preceding
fiscal year ending June 30th, together with comments and recommendations the board
considers essential.; and
Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §19202, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Advisory opinions; declaratory rulings. The authority to issue advisory opinions
and declaratory rulings related to this chapter and any rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
Sec. 9. 32 MRSA §19204, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is amended to read:
§19204. Rulemaking Rule-making authority
The board shall adopt rules that are necessary for the implementation of this chapter.
The rules may include, but need not be limited to, requirements for licensure, license
renewal and license reinstatement as well as practice setting standards, including scope of
practice, that apply to individuals licensed under this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 10. 32 MRSA §19304, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) An optometrist who holds a therapeutic advanced glaucoma license may
dispense drug samples at no charge and may use and prescribe any therapeutic
pharmaceutical, for ocular conditions including for the treatment of glaucoma. An
optometrist with a therapeutic advanced glaucoma license may prescribe any drug
identified in schedules III, IV and V and schedule II narcotic agents limited to
hydrocodone combination products as described in 21 United States Code, Section
812, for any purpose associated with ocular conditions and diseases except for oral
chemotherapeutic agents, oral immunosuppressive agents and oral
immunostimulant agents.
Sec. 11. 32 MRSA §19304, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Nothing in this This paragraph may not be construed to permit the optometric
use of pharmaceutical agents that are:
(a) Controlled substances identified in schedules I and II as described in 21
United States Code, Section 812, except for schedule II narcotic agents limited
to hydrocodone combination products; and
(b) Administered exclusively by subdermal injection, intramuscular injection,
intravenous injection, subcutaneous injection or retrobulbar injection, except
injections for the emergency treatment of anaphylactic shock; and
(c) For the specific treatment of a systemic disease unless the pharmaceutical
agent is used specifically for an ocular disease.
Page 4 - 132LR1434(01)

Sec. 12. 32 MRSA §19312, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is
amended to read:
D. The dispensing party may dispense contact lenses only upon receipt of a written
prescription, except that an optometrist may fill a prescription of another optometrist
or a physician without a copy of the prescription. Mail order contact lens suppliers
must be licensed by and register with the Maine Board of Pharmacy pursuant to Title
32, section 13751 and are subject to discipline by that board for violations of that
board's rules and the laws governing the board. An individual who fills a contact lens
prescription shall maintain a copy of that prescription for a period of 5 10 years. A
dispensing party other than an optometrist with an optometrist-patient relationship shall
forward a copy of the details of a prescription for contact lenses to the optometrist with
the optometrist-patient relationship.
Sec. 13. 32 MRSA §19602, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is amended to read:
§19602. Telehealth services permitted
A person licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the
licensee acts within the scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any
requirements and restrictions imposed by this subchapter chapter and in accordance with
standards of practice.
Sec. 14. 32 MRSA §19605, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is amended to read:
§19605. Rulemaking
The board shall adopt rules governing the provision of telehealth services by a person
licensed under this chapter in accordance with section 19204. These rules must establish
standards of practice and appropriate restrictions for the various types and forms of
telehealth services.